Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1098
Annual license; fee.

Societies which are authorized to transact business in this state immediately prior to September 6, 1985, may continue such business until April 1, 1986. The authority of such societies and all societies hereafter licensed may be renewed annually, but in all cases to terminate on the first day of the succeeding April, except that a license so issued shall continue in full force and effect until the new license is issued or specifically refused. For each such license or renewal, the society shall pay a fee of fifty dollars to the Director of Insurance. A duly certified copy or duplicate of such license shall be prima facie evidence that the licensee is a fraternal benefit society within the meaning of sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 27.